Illinois, session 104th, HB4067.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Conservation of Energy in State Government Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. It is the policy of this 7State to make every effort to reduce the amount of energy that 8is unnecessarily used and to minimize light pollution. To that 9end, turning off when possible electrical lights in State 10buildings and facilities saves energy that translates to lower 11energy bills and a smaller carbon footprint. It also reduces 12light pollution from unnecessary artificial light at night 13that can harm wildlife, disrupt natural behaviors, and 14diminish the visibility of the night sky. 15    Section 10. Regulation of electrical lights in State 16buildings and facilities. The electrical lights in State 17buildings and facilities must be turned off unless: (1) the 18building or facility or that part of it is occupied; (2) the 19building or facility is open 24-hours a day; or (3) the 20lighting is required for security or safety purposes.